Georgia, session 2025_26, SB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthy Start."
S. B. 217
- 1 -

LC 52 0717
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended in Article 3, relating to local boards of education, by
repealing and reserving Code Section 20-2-66, relating to school breakfast programs.
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in Part 5 of Article 6, relating to program weights and
funding requirements, by revising Code Section 20-2-187, relating to state-wide school lunch
program, instruction in nutrition, hygiene, etiquette, and social graces, and school food and
nutrition personnel, as follows:
"20-2-187.
(a)(1) The State Board of Education shall annually determine the amount of state funds
needed to provide a state-wide school lunch program to ensure all students enrolled in
public schools in this state have access to high-quality healthy meals to support student
learning, and such amount shall include, but shall not be limited to, funds sufficient to
ensure that such meals are offered at no cost to students who are eligible for reduced price
meals under federal and state guidelines. The state board shall, by regulation, provide for
certifying and classifying school lunch food and nutrition supervisors and managers and
establish training programs for school lunch food and nutrition personnel. The state board
is authorized to provide for the payment of:
(A)(1) Operating costs of school lunchrooms cafeterias, including, but not limited to,
breakfast costs, as financed by federal funds, for those students eligible under federal
guidelines;
(B)(2) State supplements to the salaries paid to such personnel by local units of
administration; and
(C)(3) State incentive pay for satisfactory completion of such training programs.
S. B. 217
- 2 -

LC 52 0717
(2) An application of local five mill share funds pursuant to Code Section 20-2-164 shall
not be made for payments to local units of administration under this Code section. Any
state funds appropriated for this purpose shall be used to supplement federal funds as a
means of keeping sale prices within reach of paying students and of maximizing
participation and quality meals for all students.
(b)(1) Each local school system in this state is encouraged to establish and support a
school breakfast program to make breakfast available to students.
(2) Each local school system that has a school or site with an identified student
percentage of at least 40 percent, or an identified student percentage of less than 40
percent if authorized by federal law, as determined annually by the deadline set by the
United States Department of Agriculture, shall establish and support a school breakfast
program.
(3) Each local school system operating a school breakfast program pursuant to
paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be reimbursed by the state at the federal
reimbursement rate per eligible meal prepared and served; provided, however, that, if
federal funding for the school breakfast program ceases, the state shall reimburse each
local school system operating a school breakfast program at the federal reimbursement
rate per eligible meal prepared and served that was in effect during the most recent full
school year during which federal funds were available. The State Board of Education
shall annually determine the amount of state funds needed to ensure all students enrolled
in public schools in this state operating a school breakfast program have access to
high-quality healthy meals to support student learning, and such amount shall include, but
shall not be limited to, funds sufficient to ensure that such meals are offered at no cost to
students who are eligible for reduced price meals under federal and state guidelines.
(c) An application of local five mill share funds pursuant to Code Section 20-2-164 shall
not be made for payments to local units of administration under this Code section. Any
state funds appropriated for this purpose shall be used to supplement federal funds as a
S. B. 217
- 3 -

LC 52 0717
means of maximizing student participation in school lunch programs and school breakfast
programs, to ensure all students enrolled in public schools in this state have access to
high-quality healthy meals to support student learning and that such meals are offered at
no charge to all students enrolled in a public school in this state.
(d) Local school systems shall maximize access to federal funds for the cost of school
lunch and school breakfast programs by adopting the United States Department of
Agriculture's Community Eligibility Provision or any other federal provision that, in the
opinion of the Department of Education, results in the most possible federal funding for
meals served in such program. Each local school system that has a school or site with an
identified student percentage of at least 40 percent, or an identified student percentage of
less than 40 percent if authorized by federal law, as determined annually by the deadline
set by the United States Department of Agriculture, shall participate in the federal
Community Eligibility Provision in the subsequent school year and throughout the duration
of the Community Eligibility Provision's four-year cycle. Local school systems, to the
extent practicable, shall group public schools for purposes of maximizing the number of
schools eligible to participate in the Community Eligibility Provision.
(e) The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations which:
(1) Establish minimum nutritional requirements for school lunch programs and school
breakfast programs which meet or exceed the minimum federal requirements;
(2) Utilize federal standards of income eligibility for free or reduced price meals for
low-income students;
(3) Prescribe uniform methods of determining eligibility for free or reduced price meals
that are discreet and accessible. Each participating local school system shall establish a
method to regularly notify parents of the availability of such programs;
(4) Provide that each participating local school system submit a plan of compliance;
S. B. 217
- 4 -

LC 52 0717
(5) Provide that compliance with the standards and regulations of the National School
Lunch Act and Child Nutrition Act of 1966, as amended, shall be deemed compliance
with the requirements promulgated by the board;
(6) Assist participating local school systems in applying for and obtaining start-up grant
money for such programs; and
(7) Encourage and assist participating local school systems in using Georgia grown
produce, dairy, and poultry products.
(b)(f) The State Board of Education is authorized to prescribe by appropriate rules and
regulations that there may be included as part of the program of every public school in this
100 state a course of instruction in nutrition, hygiene, etiquette, and the social graces relating
101 to the partaking of meals and is further authorized to allot funds, in a manner consistent
102 with the funding for the other various components of the instructional program, to local
103 units of administration for costs directly associated with this program. There may be
104 utilized in the course of instruction the full resources available to each individual school,
105 including its cafeterias, school lunch food and nutrition personnel, and all practical
106 demonstrations in the preparation and consumption of food which may be necessary to
107 formulate a comprehensive course of instruction in such subject matter. Any period of the
108 school day may be utilized for the teaching of this course of instruction, including that
109 period usually reserved for the lunch period.
110 (c)(1)(g)(1) The State Board of Education shall establish a system of allotments of funds
111 to local units of administration to provide for services rendered on a ten-month basis by
112 school food and nutrition personnel. The amount of funds paid to any local unit of
113 administration shall be paid in 12 monthly payments and shall be based upon the number
114 of full-time equivalent school lunch food and nutrition positions needed to plan, prepare,
115 and serve meals in that local unit of administration, multiplied by an annual base
116 payment. For each school food and nutrition manager, the local unit of administration
117 shall earn the base payment as well as an amount not to exceed $100.00 per month.
S. B. 217
- 5 -

LC 52 0717
118 (2) The base payment shall be calculated on the basis of 1,520 hours in an annual school
119 year for a full-time equivalent school lunch food and nutrition position, multiplied by an
120 amount not less than $161.00 per month for 12 months. Future annual increases in the
121 base payment shall reflect the same percentage increase provided by the state for other
122 state funded positions. The state board shall annually establish a state performance
123 standard and shall determine the number of full-time equivalent school lunch food and
124 nutrition positions needed to plan, prepare, and serve meals based on the state
125 performance standard and the average daily number of student lunches meals served
126 during the preceding school year.
127 (3) Each local unit of administration shall establish a staffing pattern and determine the
128 number of personnel to employ. Local units of administration shall establish the salary
129 schedule for school food and nutrition personnel and shall use the base payments in
130 financing the locally established salary schedule."
131 SECTION 4.
132 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 217
- 6 -